apertium-rus.rus.dix
    <pardef n="зада/ть__vblex_perf">
      <e><p><l>ть</l><r>ть<s n="vblex"/><s n="perf"/><s n="inf"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>й</l><r>ть<s n="vblex"/><s n="perf"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>йте</l><r>ть<s n="vblex"/><s n="perf"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>в</l><r>ть<s n="vblex"/><s n="perf"/><s n="pp"/><s n="adv"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>вши</l><r>ть<s n="vblex"/><s n="perf"/><s n="pp"/><s n="adv"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>нн</l><r>ть<s n="vblex"/><s n="perf"/><s n="pp"/><s n="pasv"/></r></p><par n="BASE__счастлив/ый"/></e>
      <e><p><l>вш</l><r>ть<s n="vblex"/><s n="perf"/><s n="pp"/><s n="actv"/></r></p><par n="BASE__английск/ий"/></e>
      <e><p><l>л</l><r>ть<s n="vblex"/><s n="perf"/><s n="past"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ла</l><r>ть<s n="vblex"/><s n="perf"/><s n="past"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ло</l><r>ть<s n="vblex"/><s n="perf"/><s n="past"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ли</l><r>ть<s n="vblex"/><s n="perf"/><s n="past"/><s n="mfn"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>м</l><r>ть<s n="vblex"/><s n="perf"/><s n="fut"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>дим</l><r>ть<s n="vblex"/><s n="perf"/><s n="fut"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>шь</l><r>ть<s n="vblex"/><s n="perf"/><s n="fut"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>дите</l><r>ть<s n="vblex"/><s n="perf"/><s n="fut"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ст</l><r>ть<s n="vblex"/><s n="perf"/><s n="fut"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>дут</l><r>ть<s n="vblex"/><s n="perf"/><s n="fut"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
 
    <pardef n="использ/оваться__vblex_dual">
      <e><p><l>оваться</l><r>оваться<s n="vblex"/><s n="dual"/><s n="inf"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>уйся</l><r>оваться<s n="vblex"/><s n="dual"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>уйтесь</l><r>оваться<s n="vblex"/><s n="dual"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>овавш</l><r>оваться<s n="vblex"/><s n="dual"/><s n="pp"/><s n="actv"/></r></p><par n="BASE__английск/ий"/><p><l>ся</l><r></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>овался</l><r>оваться<s n="vblex"/><s n="dual"/><s n="past"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>овалась</l><r>оваться<s n="vblex"/><s n="dual"/><s n="past"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>овалось</l><r>оваться<s n="vblex"/><s n="dual"/><s n="past"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>овались</l><r>оваться<s n="vblex"/><s n="dual"/><s n="past"/><s n="mfn"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>уясь</l><r>оваться<s n="vblex"/><s n="dual"/><s n="pprs"/><s n="adv"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ующийся</l><r>оваться<s n="vblex"/><s n="dual"/><s n="pprs"/><s n="actv"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>уюсь</l><r>оваться<s n="vblex"/><s n="dual"/><s n="nonpast"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>уемся</l><r>оваться<s n="vblex"/><s n="dual"/><s n="nonpast"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>уешься</l><r>оваться<s n="vblex"/><s n="dual"/><s n="nonpast"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>уетесь</l><r>оваться<s n="vblex"/><s n="dual"/><s n="nonpast"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>уется</l><r>оваться<s n="vblex"/><s n="dual"/><s n="nonpast"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>уются</l><r>оваться<s n="vblex"/><s n="dual"/><s n="nonpast"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
 
    <pardef n="беспоко/ить__vblex_impf">
      <e><p><l>ить</l><r>ить<s n="vblex"/><s n="impf"/><s n="inf"/></r></p></e>

      <e><p><l>ивш</l><r>ить<s n="vblex"/><s n="impf"/><s n="pp"/><s n="actv"/></r></p><par n="BASE__английск/ий"/></e>
      <!-- no pp.pasv -->
      <e><p><l>ящ</l><r>ить<s n="vblex"/><s n="impf"/><s n="pprs"/><s n="actv"/></r></p><par n="BASE__английск/ий"/></e>
      <e><p><l>им</l><r>ить<s n="vblex"/><s n="impf"/><s n="pprs"/><s n="pasv"/></r></p><par n="BASE__счастлив/ый"/></e>
      <e><p><l>я</l><r>ить<s n="vblex"/><s n="impf"/><s n="pprs"/><s n="adv"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ив</l><r>ить<s n="vblex"/><s n="impf"/><s n="pp"/><s n="adv"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="LR"><p><l>ивши</l><r>ить<s n="vblex"/><s n="impf"/><s n="pp"/><s n="adv"/></r></p></e>

      <e><p><l>ил</l><r>ить<s n="vblex"/><s n="impf"/><s n="past"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ила</l><r>ить<s n="vblex"/><s n="impf"/><s n="past"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ило</l><r>ить<s n="vblex"/><s n="impf"/><s n="past"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>или</l><r>ить<s n="vblex"/><s n="impf"/><s n="past"/><s n="mfn"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ю</l><r>ить<s n="vblex"/><s n="impf"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>им</l><r>ить<s n="vblex"/><s n="impf"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ишь</l><r>ить<s n="vblex"/><s n="impf"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ите</l><r>ить<s n="vblex"/><s n="impf"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ит</l><r>ить<s n="vblex"/><s n="impf"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ят</l><r>ить<s n="vblex"/><s n="impf"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

      <e><p><l>й</l><r>ить<s n="vblex"/><s n="impf"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>йте</l><r>ить<s n="vblex"/><s n="impf"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
 
    <pardef n="д/раться__vblex_impf">
      <e><p><l>раться</l><r>раться<s n="vblex"/><s n="impf"/><s n="inf"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ерись</l><r>раться<s n="vblex"/><s n="impf"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>еритесь</l><r>раться<s n="vblex"/><s n="impf"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>еравш</l><r>раться<s n="vblex"/><s n="impf"/><s n="pp"/><s n="actv"/></r></p><par n="BASE__английск/ий"/><p><l>ся</l><r></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>рался</l><r>раться<s n="vblex"/><s n="impf"/><s n="past"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ралась</l><r>раться<s n="vblex"/><s n="impf"/><s n="past"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ралось</l><r>раться<s n="vblex"/><s n="impf"/><s n="past"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>рались</l><r>раться<s n="vblex"/><s n="impf"/><s n="past"/><s n="mfn"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ерясь</l><r>раться<s n="vblex"/><s n="impf"/><s n="pprs"/><s n="adv"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ерущийся</l><r>раться<s n="vblex"/><s n="impf"/><s n="pprs"/><s n="actv"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ерусь</l><r>раться<s n="vblex"/><s n="impf"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ерёмся</l><r>раться<s n="vblex"/><s n="impf"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ерёшься</l><r>раться<s n="vblex"/><s n="impf"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ерётесь</l><r>раться<s n="vblex"/><s n="impf"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ерётся</l><r>раться<s n="vblex"/><s n="impf"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ерутся</l><r>раться<s n="vblex"/><s n="impf"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
 

    <e lm="беспокоить"><i>беспоко</i><par n="беспоко/ить__vblex_impf"/></e>
    <e lm="драться"><i>д</i><par n="д/раться__vblex_impf"/></e>
    <e lm="задать"><i>зада</i><par n="зада/ть__vblex_perf"/></e>
    <e lm="издать"><i>изда</i><par n="зада/ть__vblex_perf"/></e>
    <e lm="специализироваться"><i>специализир</i><par n="использ/оваться__vblex_dual"/></e>
    <e lm="использоваться"><i>использ</i><par n="использ/оваться__vblex_dual"/></e>
    <e lm="отдать"><i>отда</i><par n="зада/ть__vblex_perf"/></e>
    <e lm="подать"><i>пода</i><par n="зада/ть__vblex_perf"/></e>
    <e lm="продать"><i>прода</i><par n="зада/ть__vblex_perf"/></e>
    <e lm="создать"><i>созда</i><par n="зада/ть__vblex_perf"/></e>
    <e lm="строить"><i>стро</i><par n="беспоко/ить__vblex_impf"/></e>
